District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1020

Minimum recycled content reporting requirements.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 23
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-208, § 2, 37 DCR 8458
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
This section is referenced in § 8-1019 and § 8-1022.01.
1981 Ed., § 6-3420.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.